North Carolina statutes. Chapter 150B. Administrative Procedure Act.
Article 2A. Rules.
§ 150B-21.1A.
Adoption of an emergency rule.

Adoption. — An agency may adopt an emergency rule without prior notice or hearing or upon any abbreviated notice or hearing the agency finds practical when it finds that adherence to the notice and hearing requirements of this Part would be contrary to the public interest and that the immediate adoption of the rule is required by a serious and unforeseen threat to the public health or safety. When an agency adopts an emergency rule, it must simultaneously commence the process for adopting a temporary rule by submitting the rule to the Codifier of Rules for publication on the Internet in accordance with G.S. 150B-21.1(a3). The Department of Health and Human Services or the appropriate rule-making agency within the Department may adopt emergency rules in accordance with this section when a recent act of the General Assembly or the United States Congress or a recent change in federal regulations authorizes new or increased services or benefits for children and families and the emergency rule is necessary to implement the change in State or federal law.

Review. — An agency must prepare a written statement of its findings of need for an emergency rule. The statement must be signed by the head of the agency adopting the rule. When an agency adopts an emergency rule, it must submit the rule and the agency’s written statement of its findings of the need for the rule to the Codifier of Rules. Within two business days after an agency submits an emergency rule, the Codifier of Rules must review the agency’s written statement of findings of need for the rule to determine whether the statement of need meets the criteria in subsection (a) of this section. In reviewing the statement, the Codifier of Rules may consider any information submitted by the agency or another person. If the Codifier of Rules finds that the statement meets the criteria, the Codifier of Rules must notify the head of the agency and enter the rule in the North Carolina Administrative Code on the sixth business day following approval by the Codifier of Rules.If the Codifier of Rules finds that the statement does not meet the criteria in subsection (a) of this section, the Codifier of Rules must immediately notify the head of the agency. The agency may supplement its statement of need with additional findings or submit a new statement. If the agency provides additional findings or submits a new statement, the Codifier of Rules must review the additional findings or new statement within one business day after the agency submits the additional findings or new statement. If the Codifier of Rules again finds that the statement does not meet the criteria in subsection (a) of this section, the Codifier of Rules must immediately notify the head of the agency.If an agency decides not to provide additional findings or submit a new statement when notified by the Codifier of Rules that the agency’s findings of need for a rule do not meet the required criteria, the agency must notify the Codifier of Rules of its decision. The Codifier of Rules must then enter the rule in the North Carolina Administrative Code on the sixth business day after receiving notice of the agency’s decision. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, if the agency has not complied with the provisions of

G.S. 12-3.1

, the Codifier of Rules shall not enter the rule into the Code.

Standing. — A person aggrieved by an emergency rule adopted by an agency may file an action for declaratory judgment in Wake County Superior Court pursuant to Article 26 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes. In the action, the court shall determine whether the agency’s written statement of findings of need for the rule meets the criteria listed in subsection (a) of this section and whether the rule meets the standards in

G.S. 150B-21.9

. The court shall not grant an ex parte temporary restraining order.Filing a petition for rule making or a request for a declaratory ruling with the agency that adopted the rule is not a prerequisite to filing an action under this subsection. A person who files an action for declaratory judgment under this subsection must serve a copy of the complaint on the agency that adopted the rule being contested, the Codifier of Rules, and the Commission.

Effective Date and Expiration. — An emergency rule becomes effective on the date specified in

G.S. 150B-21.3

. An emergency rule expires on the earliest of the following dates:

The date specified in the rule.

The effective date of the temporary rule adopted to replace the emergency rule, if the Commission approves the temporary rule.

The date the Commission returns to an agency a temporary rule the agency adopted to replace the emergency rule.

Sixty days from the date the emergency rule was published in the North Carolina Register, unless the temporary rule adopted to replace the emergency rule has been submitted to the Commission.

Publication. — When the Codifier of Rules enters an emergency rule in the North Carolina Administrative Code, the Codifier of Rules must publish the rule in the North Carolina Register.

History.

2003-229, s. 3.

Medicaid — Rules, Reports, and Other Matters.

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 10.31(g), provides: “Rules, Reports, and Other Matters. —

“Rules. — The Department of Health and Human Services may adopt temporary or emergency rules according to the procedures established in

G.S. 150B-21.1

and

G.S. 150B-21.1

A when it finds that these rules are necessary to maximize receipt of federal funds within existing State appropriations, to reduce Medicaid expenditures, and to reduce fraud and abuse. The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt rules requiring providers to attend training as a condition of enrollment and may adopt temporary or emergency rules to implement the training requirement.

“Prior to the filing of the temporary or emergency rules authorized under this subsection with the Rules Review Commission and the Office of Administrative Hearings, the Department shall consult with the Office of State Budget and Management on the possible fiscal impact of the temporary or emergency rule and its effect on State appropriations and local governments.”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws
2007-323, s. 10.36(g), and Session Laws
2009-451, s. 10.58(g).

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 6.2(b), provides: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 150B-21.1

A(a), an agency may adopt an emergency rule in accordance with

G.S. 150B-21.1

A to establish or increase a fee as authorized by this act if the adoption of a rule would otherwise be required under Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.”

§ 150B-21.1B.
Expired.

History.

2009-475, s. 3; expired pursuant to 2009-475, s. 16, effective June 30, 2012.

§ 150B-21.2.
Procedure for adopting a permanent rule.

Steps. — Before an agency adopts a permanent rule, the agency must comply with the requirements of

G.S. 150B-19.1

, and it must take the following actions:

Publish a notice of text in the North Carolina Register.

When required by

G.S. 150B-21.4

, prepare or obtain a fiscal note for the proposed rule.

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-229, s. 4, effective July 1, 2003.

When required by subsection (e) of this section, hold a public hearing on the proposed rule after publication of the proposed text of the rule.

Accept oral or written comments on the proposed rule as required by subsection (f) of this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-229, s. 4, effective July 1, 2003.

Notice of Text. — A notice of the proposed text of a rule must include all of the following:

The text of the proposed rule, unless the rule is a readoption without substantive changes to the existing rule proposed in accordance with

G.S. 150B-21.3

A.

A short explanation of the reason for the proposed rule.

(2a)

A link to the agency’s website containing the information required by

G.S. 150B-19.1(c)

.

A citation to the law that gives the agency the authority to adopt the rule.

The proposed effective date of the rule.

The date, time, and place of any public hearing scheduled on the rule.

Instructions on how a person may demand a public hearing on a proposed rule if the notice does not schedule a public hearing on the proposed rule and subsection (e) of this section requires the agency to hold a public hearing on the proposed rule when requested to do so.

The (i) period of time during which and (ii) person within the agency to whom written comments may be submitted on the proposed rule.

If a fiscal note has been prepared for the rule, a statement that a copy of the fiscal note can be obtained from the agency.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-143, s. 1, effective June 19, 2013.

Mailing List. — An agency must maintain a mailing list of persons that have requested notice of rulemaking. When an agency publishes in the North Carolina Register a notice of text of a proposed rule, it must mail a copy of the notice of text to each person on the mailing list that has requested notice on the subject matter described in the notice or the rule affected. An agency may charge an annual fee to each person on the agency’s mailing list to cover copying and mailing costs.

Hearing. — An agency must hold a public hearing on a rule it proposes to adopt if the agency publishes the text of the proposed rule in the North Carolina Register and the agency receives a written request for a public hearing on the proposed rule within 15 days after the notice of text is published. The agency must accept comments at the public hearing on both the proposed rule and any fiscal note that has been prepared in connection with the proposed rule.An agency may hold a public hearing on a proposed rule and fiscal note in other circumstances. When an agency is required to hold a public hearing on a proposed rule or decides to hold a public hearing on a proposed rule when it is not required to do so, the agency must publish in the North Carolina Register a notice of the date, time, and place of the public hearing. The hearing date of a public hearing held after the agency publishes notice of the hearing in the North Carolina Register must be at least 15 days after the date the notice is published. If notice of a public hearing has been published in the North Carolina Register and that public hearing has been cancelled, the agency must publish notice in the North Carolina Register at least 15 days prior to the date of any rescheduled hearing.

Comments. — An agency must accept comments on the text of a proposed rule that is published in the North Carolina Register and any fiscal note that has been prepared in connection with the proposed rule for at least 60 days after the text is published or until the date of any public hearing held on the proposed rule, whichever is longer. An agency must consider fully all written and oral comments received.

Adoption. — An agency shall not adopt a rule until the time for commenting on the proposed text of the rule has elapsed and shall not adopt a rule if more than 12 months have elapsed since the end of the time for commenting on the proposed text of the rule. Prior to adoption, an agency must review any fiscal note that has been prepared for the proposed rule and consider any public comments received in connection with the proposed rule or the fiscal note. An agency shall not adopt a rule that differs substantially from the text of a proposed rule published in the North Carolina Register unless the agency publishes the text of the proposed different rule in the North Carolina Register and accepts comments on the proposed different rule for the time set in subsection (f) of this section.An adopted rule differs substantially from a proposed rule if it does one or more of the following:

Affects the interests of persons that, based on the proposed text of the rule published in the North Carolina Register, could not reasonably have determined that the rule would affect their interests.

Addresses a subject matter or an issue that is not addressed in the proposed text of the rule.

Produces an effect that could not reasonably have been expected based on the proposed text of the rule.

When an agency adopts a rule, it shall not take subsequent action on the rule without following the procedures in this Part. An agency must submit an adopted rule to the Rules Review Commission within 30 days of the agency’s adoption of the rule.

Explanation. — An agency must issue a concise written statement explaining why the agency adopted a rule if, within 15 days after the agency adopts the rule, a person asks the agency to do so. The explanation must state the principal reasons for and against adopting the rule and must discuss why the agency rejected any arguments made or considerations urged against the adoption of the rule. The agency must issue the explanation within 15 days after receipt of the request for an explanation.

Record. — An agency must keep a record of a rulemaking proceeding. The record must include all written comments received, a transcript or recording of any public hearing held on the rule, any fiscal note that has been prepared for the rule, and any written explanation made by the agency for adopting the rule.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 63; 1977, c. 915, s. 2; 1983, c. 927, ss. 3, 7; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1022, s. 1(1), (7); 1987, c. 285, ss. 7-9; 1989, c. 5, s. 1; 1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1995, c. 507, s. 27.8(d); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 7.10(e); 2003-229, s. 4; 2011-398, s. 5; 2013-143, s. 1; 2013-413, s. 3(a); 2021-88, s. 17.

§ 150B-21.3.
Effective date of rules.

Temporary and Emergency Rules. — A temporary rule or an emergency rule becomes effective on the date the Codifier of Rules enters the rule in the North Carolina Administrative Code.

Permanent Rule. — A permanent rule approved by the Commission becomes effective on the first day of the month following the month the rule is approved by the Commission, unless the Commission received written objections to the rule in accordance with subsection (b2) of this section, or unless the agency that adopted the rule specifies a later effective date.

(b1)

Delayed Effective Dates. —

Except as provided in

G.S. 14-4.1

, if the Commission received written objections to the rule in accordance with subsection (b2) of this section, the rule becomes effective on the earlier of the thirty-first legislative day or the day of adjournment of the next regular session of the General Assembly that begins at least 25 days after the date the Commission approved the rule, unless a different effective date applies under this section. If a bill that specifically disapproves the rule is introduced in either house of the General Assembly before the thirty-first legislative day of that session, the rule becomes effective on the earlier of either the day an unfavorable final action is taken on the bill or the day that session of the General Assembly adjourns without ratifying a bill that specifically disapproves the rule. If the agency adopting the rule specifies a later effective date than the date that would otherwise apply under this subsection, the later date applies. A permanent rule that is not approved by the Commission or that is specifically disapproved by a bill enacted into law before it becomes effective does not become effective.A bill specifically disapproves a rule if it contains a provision that refers to the rule by appropriate North Carolina Administrative Code citation and states that the rule is disapproved. Notwithstanding any rule of either house of the General Assembly, any member of the General Assembly may introduce a bill during the first 30 legislative days of any regular session to disapprove a rule that has been approved by the Commission and that either has not become effective or has become effective by executive order under subsection (c) of this section.

(b2)

Objection. —

Any person who objects to the adoption of a permanent rule may submit written comments to the agency. If the objection is not resolved prior to adoption of the rule, a person may submit written objections to the Commission. If the Commission receives written objections from 10 or more persons, no later than 5:00 P.M. of the day following the day the Commission approves the rule, clearly requesting review by the legislature in accordance with instructions posted on the agency’s Web site pursuant to G.S. 150B-19.1(c)(4), and the Commission approves the rule, the rule will become effective as provided in subsection (b1) of this section. The Commission shall notify the agency that the rule is subject to legislative disapproval on the day following the day it receives 10 or more written objections. When the requirements of this subsection have been met and a rule is subject to legislative disapproval, the agency may adopt the rule as a temporary rule if the rule would have met the criteria listed in G.S. 150B-21.1(a) at the time the notice of text for the permanent rule was published in the North Carolina Register. If the Commission receives objections from 10 or more persons clearly requesting review by the legislature, and the rule objected to is one of a group of related rules adopted by the agency at the same time, the agency that adopted the rule may cause any of the other rules in the group to become effective as provided in subsection (b1) of this section by submitting a written statement to that effect to the Commission before the other rules become effective.

Executive Order Exception. — The Governor may, by executive order, make effective a permanent rule that has been approved by the Commission but the effective date of which has been delayed in accordance with subsection (b1) of this section upon finding that it is necessary that the rule become effective in order to protect public health, safety, or welfare. A rule made effective by executive order becomes effective on the date the order is issued or at a later date specified in the order. When the Codifier of Rules enters in the North Carolina Administrative Code a rule made effective by executive order, the entry must reflect this action.A rule that is made effective by executive order remains in effect unless it is specifically disapproved by the General Assembly in a bill enacted into law on or before the day of adjournment of the regular session of the General Assembly that begins at least 25 days after the date the executive order is issued. A rule that is made effective by executive order and that is specifically disapproved by a bill enacted into law is repealed as of the date specified in the bill. If a rule that is made effective by executive order is not specifically disapproved by a bill enacted into law within the time set by this subsection, the Codifier of Rules must note this in the North Carolina Administrative Code.

(c1)

Fees. —

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a rule that establishes a new fee or increases an existing fee shall not become effective until the agency has complied with the requirements of

G.S. 12-3.1

.

Legislative Day and Day of Adjournment. — As used in this section:

A “legislative day” is a day on which either house of the General Assembly convenes in regular session.

The “day of adjournment” of a regular session held in an odd-numbered year is the day the General Assembly adjourns by joint resolution or by operation of law for more than 30 days.

The “day of adjournment” of a regular session held in an even-numbered year is the day the General Assembly adjourns sine die.

OSHA Standard. — A permanent rule concerning an occupational safety and health standard that is adopted by the Occupational Safety and Health Division of the Department of Labor and is identical to a federal regulation promulgated by the Secretary of the United States Department of Labor becomes effective on the date the Division delivers the rule to the Codifier of Rules, unless the Division specifies a later effective date. If the Division specifies a later effective date, the rule becomes effective on that date.

Technical Change. — A permanent rule for which no notice or hearing is required under G.S. 150B-21.5(a)(1) through (a)(5) or G.S. 150B-21.5(b) becomes effective on the first day of the month following the month the rule is approved by the Rules Review Commission.

History.

1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1995, c. 507, s. 27.8(e); 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 742, s. 43; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 7.10(f); 1997-34, s. 3; 2001-487, s. 80(b); 2002-97, s. 5; 2003-229, s. 5; 2004-156, ss. 2, 3; 2012-194, s. 66.5(b); 2015-264, s. 23; 2019-198, s. 2.

Administrative Rules Governing Sanitation of Hospitals, Nursing Homes, Rest Homes, and Other Institutions.

Session Laws
2002-160, ss. 1-5, effective October 17, 2002, provide: “Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.3(b), amendments to the following rules governing sanitation of hospitals, nursing homes, rest homes, and other institutions, adopted by the Commission for Health Services [now the Commission for Public Health] and approved by the Rules Review Commission on October 18, 2001, become effective March 1, 2003:
15A NCAC 18A .1301 (Definitions),
15A NCAC 18A .1302 (Approval of Plans),
15A NCAC 18A .1304 (Inspections),
15A NCAC 18A .1305 (Grading Residential Care Facilities in Institutions),
15A NCAC 18A .1306 (Public Display of Grade Card),
15A NCAC 18A .1307 (Reinspections),
15A NCAC 18A .1308 (Approved Institutions),
15A NCAC 18A .1309 (Floors),
15A NCAC 18A .1310 (Walls and Ceilings),
15A NCAC 18A .1312 (Toilet: Handwashing: Laundry: and Bathing Facilities),
15A NCAC 18A .1313 (Water Supply),
15A NCAC 18A .1314 (Drinking Water Facilities: Ice Handling),
15A NCAC 18A .1315 (Liquid Wastes),
15A NCAC 18A .1316 (Solid Wastes),
15A NCAC 18A .1317 (Vermin Control: Premises: Animal Maintenance),
15A NCAC 18A .1318 (Miscellaneous),
15A NCAC 18A .1319 (Furnishings and Patient Contact Items),
15A NCAC 18A .1320 (Food Service Utensils and Equipment),
15A NCAC 18A .1322 (Milk and Milk Products),
15A NCAC 18A .1323 (Food Protection), and
15A NCAC 18A .1324 (Employees).

“Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.3(b), 15A NCAC 18A .1327 (Incorporated Rules) adopted by the Commission for Health Services [now the Commission for Public Health] and approved by the Rules Review Commission on October 18, 2001 becomes effective March 1, 2003.

“Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.3(b), amendments to
15A NCAC 18A .1311 (Lighting, Ventilation and Moisture Control) and
15A NCAC 18A .1321 (Food Supplies) adopted by the Commission for Health Services [now the Commission for Public Health] and approved by the Rules Review Commission on November 15, 2001 become effective March 1, 2003.

“The Division of Environmental Health [Division of Water Resources] of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources, with the assistance of local health departments, shall field test the amended rules listed in Sections 1 through 3 of this act by conducting trial inspections of a representative sample of facilities subject to the amended rules throughout the State. Trial inspections under the amended rules shall be performed during the period 1 October 2002 through 1 February 2003 in conjunction with the regular inspection of the representative sample of facilities under rules in effect during the field test period. A facility that is subject to a trial inspection shall not be liable for an enforcement action for any violation of an amended rule that is observed during a trial inspection but may be liable for an enforcement action under rules in effect during the field test period. The purposes of the field test shall be to determine what expenditures, if any, will be required of facilities in order to comply with the amended rules and whether the amended rules will result in lower inspection grades for facilities. As a part of the field test, the Division shall also review the amended rules, giving particular attention to applicable federal regulations and to the incorporation by reference of any other rules or standards in the amended rules, to determine whether the amended rules will result in any duplication or conflict in applicable requirements or standards and whether the amended rules will result in duplicative or conflicting inspection or enforcement policies or procedures. The Division of Environmental Health [Division of Water Resources] shall compile and analyze field test data to determine whether any of the amended rules should be revised. The Division shall report the results of the field test required by this section, any recommendations to the Commission for Health Services [now the Commission for Public Health] regarding revisions to the amended rules, and the status of any recommended rule revisions to the Environmental Review Commission on or before March 1, 2003.

“The Division of Environmental Health [Division of Water Resources] of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall offer training to staff of facilities that are subject to the amended rules listed in Sections 1 through 3 of this act. Training shall be offered in the various regions of the State as appropriate and shall include information on the requirements of the amended rules, enforcement policies and procedures, and updated information as to any revisions to the amended rules that may be recommended as a result of the field test of the amended rules required by Section 4 of this act.”

Session Laws
2002-160, s. 6(a)-(d), effective October 17, 2002, as amended by Session Laws
2003-284, s. 10.8C, effective July 1, 2003, provides: “This act constitutes a recent act of the General Assembly within the meaning of
G.S. 150B-21.1(a).

“Notwithstanding Sections 1 through 3 of this act, the Commission for Health Services [now the Commission for Public Health] may adopt temporary and permanent rules to further delay the effective date of any of the rules listed in Sections 1 through 3 of this act. The Commission for Health Services may adopt temporary and permanent rules to revise any of the rules listed in Sections 1 through 3 of this act.

“The Medical Care Commission may adopt temporary and permanent rules to amend Subchapter 42C (Licensing of Family Care Homes) and Subchapter 42D (Licensing of Homes for the Aged and Infirm) of Chapter 42 (Individual and Family Support) of Title 10 (Department of Health and Human Services) of the North Carolina Administrative Code. Prior to the adoption of temporary rules under this subsection, the Commission shall:

“(1) Consult with persons who may be interested in the subject matter of the temporary rule during the development of the text of the proposed temporary rule.

“(2) Notify persons on the mailing list that the Commission maintains pursuant to
G.S. 150B-21.2(d) of its intent to adopt a temporary rule.

“(3) Publish a notice of intent to adopt a temporary rule in the North Carolina Register. The notice shall set out the text of the proposed temporary rule and include the name of the person to whom questions and written comment on the proposed rule may be submitted. The Commission shall accept written comment on the proposed temporary rule for at least 30 days after the notice of intent to adopt the temporary rule is published in the North Carolina Register.

“(4) Hold at least one public hearing on the proposed temporary rule.

“Notwithstanding
26 NCAC 2C.0102(11), the Medical Care Commission may adopt temporary rules as provided in this section until July 1, 2004.”

Session Laws
2003-143, s. 1, effective June 4, 2003, provides: “Pursuant to
G.S. 150B-21.3(b), the following Life Insurance Replacement Rules that were adopted by the Department of Insurance and approved by the Rules Review Commission on December 19, 2002, are disapproved:

“(1)
11 NCAC 12.0601 — Purpose and Scope.

“(2)
11 NCAC 12.0602 — Definition of Replacement.

“(3)
11 NCAC 12.0603 — Other Definitions.

“(4)
11 NCAC 12.0604 — Exemptions.

“(5)
11 NCAC 12.0605 — Duties of Producers.

“(6)
11 NCAC 12.0606 — Duties of Existing Insurer.

“(7)
11 NCAC 12.0607 — Duties of Insurers That Use Producers.

“(8)
11 NCAC 12.0608 — Duties of Insurers With Respect to Direct Response Sales.

“(9)
11 NCAC 12.0609 — Violations and Penalties.

“(10)
11 NCAC 12.0611 — Notice Regarding Replacement.

“(11)
11 NCAC 12.0612 — Duties of Replacing Insurers That Use Producers.”

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 10.35B, provides: “Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.1(b) and
G.S. 150B-21.3(b2), the Department of Health and Human Services may adopt as temporary rules the rules governing residential treatment for children or adolescents approved for adoption or revision on May 18, 2005, by the Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, and approved by the Rules Review Commission. The temporary rules shall become effective as provided in
G.S. 150B-21.3(a).”

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2005.’ ”

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 46.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2005-2007
fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only
to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 46.5, is a severability clause.

§ 150B-21.3A.
Periodic review and expiration of existing rules.

Definitions. — For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

Commission. — Means the Rules Review Commission.

Committee. — Means the Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee.

(2a)

Necessary rule. — Means any rule other than an unnecessary rule.

, (4)Repealed by Session Laws 2019-140, s. 3(a), effective July 19, 2019, and applicable to agency rule reports submitted to the Office of Administrative Hearings pursuant to

G.S. 150B-21.3

A(c)(1) on or after October 1, 2019.

(5)

Public comment. — Means written comments objecting to the rule, in whole or in part, or objecting to an agency’s determination of the rule as necessary or unnecessary, received by an agency from any member of the public, including an association or other organization representing the regulated community or other members of the public.

(6)

Unnecessary rule. — Means a rule that the agency determines to be obsolete, redundant, or otherwise not needed.

Automatic Expiration. — Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, any rule for which the agency that adopted the rule has not conducted a review in accordance with this section shall expire on the date set in the schedule established by the Commission pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.

Review Process. — Each agency subject to this Article shall conduct a review of the agency’s existing rules at least once every 10 years in accordance with the following process:

Step 1: The agency shall conduct an analysis of each existing rule and make an initial determination as to whether the rule is necessary or unnecessary. The agency shall then post the results of the initial determination on its Web site and invite the public to comment on the rules and the agency’s initial determination. The agency shall also submit the results of the initial determination to the Office of Administrative Hearings for posting on its Web site. The agency shall accept public comment for no less than 60 days following the posting. The agency shall review the public comments and prepare a brief response addressing the merits of each comment. After completing this process, the agency shall submit a report to the Commission. The report shall include the following items:

The agency’s initial determination.

All public comments received in response to the agency’s initial determination.

The agency’s response to the public comments.

Step 2: The Commission shall review the reports received from the agencies pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection. If a public comment relates to a rule that the agency determined to be unnecessary, the Commission shall determine whether the public comment has merit and, if so, designate the rule as necessary. For purposes of this subsection, a public comment has merit if it addresses the specific substance of the rule. The Commission shall prepare a final determination report and submit the report to the Committee for consultation in accordance with subdivision (3) of this subsection. The report shall include the following items:

The agency’s initial determination.

All public comments received in response to the agency’s initial determination.

The agency’s response to the public comments.

A summary of the Commission’s determinations regarding public comments.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-140, s. 3(a), effective July 19, 2019, and applicable to agency rule reports submitted to the Office of Administrative Hearings pursuant to

G.S. 150B-21.3

A(c)(1) on or after October 1, 2019.

A determination that all rules that the agency determined to be unnecessary and for which no public comment was received or for which the Commission determined that the public comment was without merit shall expire on the first day of the month following the date the report becomes effective in accordance with this section.

A determination that all rules that the agency determined to be necessary or that the Commission designated as necessary shall be readopted as though the rules were new rules in accordance with this Article.

Step 3: The final determination report shall not become effective until the agency has consulted with the Committee. The determinations contained in the report pursuant to sub-subdivisions f. and g. of subdivision (2) of this subsection shall become effective on the date the report is reviewed by the Committee. If the Committee does not hold a meeting to hear the consultation required by this subdivision within 60 days of receipt of the final determination report, the consultation requirement is deemed satisfied, and the determinations contained in the report become effective on the 61st day following the date the Committee received the report. If the Committee disagrees with a determination regarding a specific rule contained in the report, the Committee may recommend that the General Assembly direct the agency to conduct a review of the specific rule in accordance with this section in the next year following the consultation.

Timetable. — The Commission shall establish a schedule for the review and readoption of existing rules in accordance with this section on a decennial basis as follows:

With regard to the review process, the Commission shall assign each Title of the Administrative Code a date by which the review required by this section must be completed. In establishing the schedule, the Commission shall consider the scope and complexity of rules subject to this section and the resources required to conduct the review required by this section. The Commission shall have broad authority to modify the schedule and extend the time for review in appropriate circumstances. Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this section, if the agency fails to conduct the review by the date set by the Commission, the rules contained in that Title which have not been reviewed will expire. The Commission shall report to the Committee any agency that fails to conduct the review. The Commission may exempt rules that have been adopted or amended within the previous 10 years from the review required by this section. However, any rule exempted on this basis must be reviewed in accordance with this section no more than 10 years following the last time the rule was amended.

With regard to the readoption of rules as required by sub-subdivision (c)(2)g. of this section, once the final determination report becomes effective, the Commission shall establish a date by which the agency must readopt the rules. The Commission shall consult with the agency and shall consider the agency’s rule-making priorities in establishing the readoption date. The agency may amend a rule as part of the readoption process. If a rule is readopted without substantive change or if the rule is amended to impose a less stringent burden on regulated persons, the agency is not required to prepare a fiscal note as provided by

G.S. 150B-21.4

.

Exclusions. — The Commission shall report annually to the Committee on any rules that do not expire pursuant to this subsection. The following rules shall not expire as provided in this section:

Rules adopted to conform to or implement federal law.

Rules deemed by the Boards of Trustees established under

G.S. 128-28

and

G.S. 135-6

to protect inchoate or accrued rights of members of the Retirement Systems administered by the State Treasurer.

(e1)

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-140, s. 3(a), effective July 19, 2019, and applicable to agency rule reports submitted to the Office of Administrative Hearings pursuant to

G.S. 150B-21.3

A(c)(1) on or after October 1, 2019.

Other Reviews. — Notwithstanding any provision of this section, an agency may subject a rule that it determines to be unnecessary to review under this section at any time by notifying the Commission that it wishes to be placed on the schedule for the current year. The Commission may also subject a rule to review under this section at any time by notifying the agency that the rule has been placed on the schedule for the current year.

History.

2013-413, s. 3(b); 2014-115, s. 17; 2014-120, s. 2; 2015-164, s. 7; 2015-286, s. 1.6(a); 2019-140, s. 3(a).